Vermont, session 2025-2026, H532.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 21 V.S.A. § 495g is amended to read:
§ 495g. PROVISION APPLICABLE TO COLLEGE PROFESSORS
Nothing in this subchapter shall be construed to prohibit any institution of
higher education as defined by section 1201(a) of the federal Higher Education
Act of 1965 from retiring any employee who is serving under a contract of
unlimited tenure, who attains 70 years of age. Any employee whose tenure
contract is terminated may, in the discretion of the institution, be allowed to
continue in the employ of the institution on a nontenured basis. [Repealed.]

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE H.532
2026 Page 2 of 2
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.